Hawaii statutes.
§386-55 Trustee in case of lump sum
payments. Whenever for any reason the director of labor and industrial
relations deems it advisable, any lump sum which is payable as provided in
section 386-54 shall be paid to a suitable individual or corporation appointed
by the circuit judge in whose jurisdiction the work injury occurred as trustee
to administer or apply the same for the benefit of the disabled worker or the
dependent entitled thereto in the manner determined by the director. The
receipt of the trustee for the amount so paid shall discharge the employer of
the employer's liability. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-54; HRS §386-55;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next